Ohio, session 136, HB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.607 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.607. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes 8
of state route number two between mile marker one hundred 9
seventeen and mile marker one hundred twenty-two, in Ottawa 10
county, shall be known as the "Cpl. Robert Dockstader Memorial 11
Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14